Utah statutes.
62A-15-622.   Abduction of patient -- Penalty.

Any person who abducts a patient who is in the custody of a local mental health authority, or induces any patient to elope or escape from that custody, or attempts to do so, or aids or assists therein, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor, in addition to liability for damages, or subject to other criminal charges.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

